tr_test.dic
alçılamak/ё
ılımak/ё
kayarlamak/ё
aykırılamak/ё
makyajlamak/ё
sağlamlamak/ё
mızımak/ё
fırınlamak/ё
kaşımak/ё
fışlamak/ё
kararlamak/ё
malaklamak/ё
fısfıslamak/ё
tokatlamak/ё
ıklamak/ё
kaynamak/ё
çaşıtlamak/ё
kazımak/ё
barikatlamak/ё
yıpramak/ё
haşıllamak/ё
yazlamak/ё
halkalamak/ё
çalımlamak/ё
ayrımsamak/ё
kınalamak/ё
sandıklamak/ё
fırçalamak/ё
yansılamak/ё
tapanlamak/ё
bukağılamak/ё
kıskaçlamak/ё
arılamak/ё
kayşamak/ё
hırlamak/ё
zamklamak/ё
pataklamak/ё
cıyırdamak/ё
avlamak/ё
kalıplamak/ё
kakırdamak/ё
azımsamak/ё
balkımak/ё
kargılamak/ё
madımak/ё
rastlamak/ё
kolalamak/ё
notalamak/ё
sayfalamak/ё
çıdamak/ё
kaplamak/ё
orantılamak/ё
dışsatımlamak/ё
palazlamak/ё
zırvalamak/ё
çomaklamak/ё
abramak/ё
ilaçlamak/ё
yumaklamak/ё
tangırdamak/ё
tırpanlamak/ё
cırtlamak/ё
taylamak/ё
mayalamak/ё
bordalamak/ё
vidalamak/ё
montajlamak/ё
şişmanlamak/ё
hışıldamak/ё
bağıtlamak/ё
haşlamak/ё
ıslamak/ё
paylamak/ё
çabalamak/ё
mandallamak/ё
kaypamak/ё
kiralamak/ё
çaprazlamak/ё
yankılamak/ё
haşırdamak/ё
arkalamak/ё
tekrarlamak/ё
haylamak/ё
sıçramak/ё
kavramak/ё
karımak/ё
savlamak/ё
harlamak/ё
sırımak/ё
kasalamak/ё
ansımak/ё
ağlamsamak/ё
dayantılamak/ё
hırsızlamak/ё
kıtlamak/ё
palamarlamak/ё
sıklamak/ё
yakılamak/ё
çıvgarlamak/ё
abartma/ё
acıkılma/ё
adaklama/ё
adlanma/ё
afsunlanma/ё
akaçlatma/ё
aksırma/ё
akçalama/ё
akşamlama/ё
alazlama/ё
aldırılma/ё
alkışlanma/ё
alçılama/ё
alışılma/ё
amonyaklama/ё
anlatma/ё
anılma/ё
anıştırmalı/ё
araklanma/ё
araştırtma/ё
artakalma/ё
artırtma/ё
arındırma/ё
asfaltlatma/ё
asılma/ё
atlattırma/ё
atışma/ё
avuçlatma/ё
ayarlatma/ё
aydınlatma/ё
ayrımsanma/ё
ayılma/ё
azalma/ё
azdırılma/ё
azışma/ё
açıklamalı/ё
açınma/ё
ağlama/ё
ağrıtma/ё
ağırşaklanma/ё
aştırma/ё
aşırma/ё
bakayazma/ё
ballandırma/ё
balyozlanma/ё
banlama/ё
barınma/ё
bastırma/ё
batırtma/ё
bayma/ё
bağdalama/ё
bağlatma/ё
bağırtma/ё
bağışlatılma/ё
başlama/ё
beyazlatılma/ё
bolalma/ё
bordalama/ё
boyatma/ё
bozarma/ё
boğazlatılma/ё
boşandırma/ё
budaklandırma/ё
bulandırılma/ё
bulgulanma/ё
buralı/ё
buzlanma/ё
bılkıma/ё
bıyıklanma/ё
canlandırılma/ё
cayırdama/ё
cicozlama/ё
coplama/ё
cumbuldama/ё
cırnaklama/ё
cıvıldaşma/ё
cızlama/ё
dalama/ё
dalgalandırılma/ё
daralama/ё
dayanışmalı/ё
depolatma/ё
domaltma/ё
duldalama/ё
duvaklanma/ё
dışlama/ё
faydalandırılma/ё
fosurdatma/ё
fırıldanma/ё
fışkılama/ё
gazaplandırma/ё
gıdaklama/ё
hapşırma/ё
hasırlama/ё
haydalama/ё
helecanlanma/ё
horlanma/ё
hırpalama/ё
hışırdama/ё
inanma/ё
kabuklanma/ё
kalaylama/ё
kalma/ё
kanatlandırma/ё
kansa/ё
kapattırma/ё
karalatma/ё
karmaşma/ё
karşılaştırma/ё
kata/ё
katıklama/ё
kavurmalı/ё
kaynaklanma/ё
kazandırma/ё
kaçımsama/ё
kaşlama/ё
klorlatma/ё
kollama/ё
konuşlanma/ё
kostaklanma/ё
kucaklama/ё
kurgulanma/ё
kutlanma/ё
kâğıtlama/ё
kımıldama/ё
kırbaçlama/ё
kırpışma/ё
kıskandırma/ё
kıtırdatma/ё
kıymalı/ё
kığılama/ё
lığlanma/ё
mantarlama/ё
maşala/ё
mumyalama/ё
mırlama/ё
nazlandırma/ё
nurlandırma/ё
olumlanma/ё
onaylatılma/ё
otlama/ё
oymacı/ё
pahalandırma/ё
paralatılma/ё
paspaslatma/ё
paylaştırılma/ё
pofurdatma/ё
programlama/ё
pusatlandırma/ё
pıstırma/ё
rastlama/ё
sabırsızlandırma/ё
sala/ё
salçalama/ё
saplama/ё
sapıttırma/ё
sarsma/ё
sattırma/ё
savma/ё
saylama/ё
saçmalama/ё
sağılma/ё
silahlanma/ё
soluklatma/ё
sonuçlanma/ё
soğuklama/ё
sülfatlama/ё
sınama/ё
sıralanma/ё
sıvanma/ё
sızdırtılma/ё
sıçtırma/ё
sığıştırma/ё
takırdanma/ё
tanlama/ё
tanıştırılma/ё
tapırdama/ё
tarttırma/ё
taslama/ё
taşlamacı/ё
tezgâhlama/ё
tokurdanma/ё
toplatılma/ё
tunçlama/ё
tuşlama/ё
tıkırdama/ё
tınlatma/ё
tırmalama/ё
tırıllama/ё
ulaştırılma/ё
utandırma/ё
uygulattırma/ё
uzama/ё
uğralama/ё
vakvaklama/ё
vurayazma/ё
yabancılama/ё
yaklaşma/ё
yalanlatma/ё
yalıtma/ё
yanlama/ё
yaptırılma/ё
yararlandırma/ё
yarılama/ё
yassıltma/ё
yavrulatma/ё
yazdırma/ё
yağmurlama/ё
yoklamacı/ё
yoğaltılma/ё
yumuşatma/ё
yıkanma/ё
yıllanma/ё
yığılma/ё
zorlama/ё
zıpkınlanma/ё
çaktırılma/ё
çalkanma/ё
çapalama/ё
çarptırılma/ё
çatlatma/ё
çavlanma/ё
çimentolanma/ё
çullandırma/ё
çıkınlama/ё
çırpınma/ё
çığrışma/ё
ılıtma/ё
ıslanma/ё
ısıtılma/ё
şahlanma/ё
şapırdatma/ё
şişmanlatma/ё
anahtarlamak/ё
